pl: Metoda ekstrakcji: CO₂ (nadkrytyczny); Tłoczone na zimno; Etanol; Węglowodór; Infuzja lipidowa; Infuzja w oliwie z oliwek; Bezrozpuszczalnikowy (żywica); Destylacja parowa; Inne
sv: Extraktionsmetod: CO₂ (superkritisk); Kallpressad; Etanol; Kolväte; Lipidinfusion; Olivoljeinfusion; Lösningsmedelfri (rosin); Ångdestillation; Övrigt
ro-RO: Metodă de extracție: CO₂ (supercritic); Presat la rece; Etanol; Hidrocarbură; Infuzie lipidică; Infuzie cu ulei de măsline; Fără solvent (colofoniu); Distilare cu aburi; Altele
ja: 抽出方法: CO₂（超臨界）; コールドプレス; エタノール; 炭化水素; 脂質浸出; オリーブオイル浸出; 溶剤不使用（ロジン）; 水蒸気蒸留; その他
ko: 추출 방법: CO₂ (초임계); 냉압착; 에탄올; 탄화수소; 지질 인퓨전; 올리브 오일 인퓨전; 무용매 (로진); 증기 증류; 기타
tr: Ekstraksiyon yöntemi: CO₂ (süperkritik); Soğuk sıkım; Etanol; Hidrokarbon; Lipid infüzyonu; Zeytinyağı infüzyonu; Çözücüsüz (reçine); Buhar distilasyonu; Diğer
pt-BR: Método de extração: CO₂ (supercrítico); Prensado a frio; Etanol; Hidrocarboneto; Infusão lipídica; Infusão de azeite de oliva; Sem solvente (rosina); Destilação a vapor; Outro
th: วิธีการสกัด: CO₂ (ซุปเปอร์คริติคอล); สกัดเย็น; เอทานอล; ไฮโดรคาร์บอน; การผสมกับไขมัน; การผสมกับน้ำมันมะกอก; ไร้ตัวทำละลาย (โรซิน); การกลั่นด้วยไอน้ำ; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Metoda ekstrakcije: CO₂ (superkritični); Hladno prešano; Etanol; Ugljikovodik; Lipidna infuzija; Infuzija maslinovog ulja; Bez otapala (rosin); Parna destilacija; Ostalo
pt-PT: Método de extração: CO₂ (supercrítico); Prensado a frio; Etanol; Hidrocarboneto; Infusão lipídica; Infusão em azeite; Sem solvente (resina); Destilação a vapor; Outro
nb: Ekstraksjonsmåte: CO₂ (superkritisk); Kaldpresset; Etanol; Hydrokarbon; Lipidinfusjon; Olivenoljeinfusjon; Løsningsmiddelfri (harpiks); Dampdestillasjon; Annet
da: Ekstraktionsmetode: CO₂ (superkritisk); Koldpresset; Ethanol; Kulbrinte; Lipidinfusion; Olivenolieinfusion; Opløsningsmiddelfri (harpiks); Dampdestillation; Andet
el: Μέθοδος εκχύλισης: CO₂ (υπερκρίσιμο); Ψυχρής πίεσης; Αιθανόλη; Υδρογονάνθρακας; Λιπιδική έγχυση; Έγχυση ελαιολάδου; Χωρίς διαλύτη (ρητίνη); Απόσταξη με ατμό; Άλλο
nl: Extractiemethode: CO₂ (superkritisch); Koudgeperst; Ethanol; Koolwaterstof; Lipideninfusie; Olijfolieinfusie; Oplosmiddelvrij (hars); Stoomdestillatie; Andere
sl-SI: Metoda ekstrakcije: CO₂ (superkritični); Hladno stiskano; Etanol; Ogljikovodik; Lipidna infuzija; Infuzija z olivnim oljem; Brez topila (rozin); Parna destilacija; Drugo
bg-BG: Метод на екстракция: CO₂ (суперкритичен); Студено пресован; Етанол; Въглеводород; Липидна инфузия; Инфузия със зехтин; Без разтворител (колофон); Парна дестилация; Други
vi: Phương pháp chiết xuất: CO₂ (siêu tới hạn); Ép lạnh; Ethanol; Hydrocarbon; Ngâm chiết lipid; Ngâm dầu ô liu; Không dung môi (nhựa thông); Chưng cất hơi nước; Khác
it: Metodo di estrazione: CO₂ (supercritico); Spremuto a freddo; Etanolo; Idrocarburo; Infusione lipidica; Infusione in olio d'oliva; Senza solvente (colofonia); Distillazione a vapore; Altro
fr: Méthode d’extraction: CO₂ (supercritique); Pressé à froid; Ethanol; Hydrocarbure; Infusion lipidique; Infusion d'huile d'olive; Sans solvant (colophane); Distillation à la vapeur; Autre
zh-CN: 提取方法: 二氧化碳（超临界）; 冷压; 乙醇; 碳氢化合物; 脂质浸泡; 橄榄油浸泡; 无溶剂（松香）; 蒸汽蒸馏; 其他
ru: Метод экстракции: CO₂ (сверхкритический); Холодного отжима; Этанол; Углеводород; Липидная инфузия; Инфузия оливкового масла; Без растворителя (канифоль); Паровая дистилляция; Другой
fi: Uuttomenetelmä: CO₂ (superkriittinen); Kylmäpuristettu; Etanoli; Hiilivety; Lipidiuutos; Oliiviöljyuutos; Liuotteeton (rosin); Höyrytislaus; Muu
cs: Extrakční metoda: CO₂ (superkritický); Lisované za studena; Ethanol; Uhlovodík; Lipidová infuze; Infuze v olivovém oleji; Bezrozpouštědlový (kalafuna); Parní destilace; Jiné
zh-TW: 萃取方法: 二氧化碳（超臨界）; 冷壓; 乙醇; 碳氫化合物; 脂質浸泡; 橄欖油浸泡; 無溶劑（松香）; 蒸汽蒸餾; 其他
de: Extraktionsmethode: CO₂ (überkritisch); Kaltgepresst; Ethanol; Kohlenwasserstoff; Lipidinfusion; Olivenölinfusion; Lösungsmittelfrei (Kolophonium); Wasserdampfdestillation; Sonstiges
en: Extraction method: CO₂ (supercritical); Cold-pressed; Ethanol; Hydrocarbon; Lipid infusion; Olive oil infusion; Solventless (rosin); Steam distillation; Other
es: Método de extracción: CO₂ (supercrítico); Prensado en frío; Etanol; Hidrocarburo; Infusión lipídica; Infusión de aceite de oliva; Sin solvente (resina); Destilación por vapor; Otros
hu: Kivonási módszer: CO₂ (szuperkritikus); Hidegen sajtolt; Etanol; Szénhidrogén; Lipid infúzió; Olívaolaj infúzió; Oldószermentes (gyanta); Gőzdesztilláció; Egyéb
sk-SK: Metóda extrakcie: CO₂ (superkritický); Lisovaný za studena; Etanol; Uhľovodík; Lipidová infúzia; Olivová olejová infúzia; Bezrozpúšťadlový (kalafúna); Parná destilácia; Iné
lt-LT: Ekstrahavimo metodas: CO₂ (superkritinis); Šalto spaudimo; Etanolis; Angliavandenilis; Lipidų infuzija; Alyvuogių aliejaus infuzija; Be tirpiklio (kanifolija); Garų distiliavimas; Kita